Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1836
Civil service; creation or elimination of positions.

All positions subject to the Civil Service Act shall be created or eliminated by the governing body of the municipality. The Civil Service Act shall not be construed to infringe upon the power and authority of (1) the governing body of the municipality to establish pursuant to section 16-310, 17-108, or 17-209 the salaries and compensation of all employees employed hereunder or (2) the city manager, pursuant to the City Manager Plan of Government Act, to establish the salaries and compensation of employees within the compensation schedule or ranges established by the governing body for the positions.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 11, p. 135;

R.S.1943, § 19-1811;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1811;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 15;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 127.

City Manager Plan of Government Act, see section 19-601.